Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.080

Sentence on two or more convictions or counts.

(1) Whenever a person while under sentence of felony shall commit another felony and be sentenced to another term of imprisonment, such latter term shall not begin until the expiration of all prior terms: PROVIDED, That any person granted probation pursuant to the provisions of RCW 9.95.210 and/or 9.92.060 shall not be considered to be under sentence of a felony for the purposes of this subsection.

(2) Whenever a person is convicted of two or more offenses which arise from a single act or omission, the sentences imposed therefor shall run concurrently, unless the court, in pronouncing sentence, expressly orders the service of said sentences to be consecutive.

(3) In all other cases, whenever a person is convicted of two or more offenses arising from separate and distinct acts or omissions, and not otherwise governed by the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the sentences imposed therefor shall run consecutively, unless the court, in pronouncing the second or other subsequent sentences, expressly orders concurrent service thereof.

(4) The sentencing court may require the secretary of corrections, or his or her designee, to provide information to the court concerning the existence of all prior judgments against the defendant, the terms of imprisonment imposed, and the status thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 331; 1981 c 136 s 35; 1971 ex.s. c 295 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 109 s 2; 1909 c 249 s 33; RRS s 2285.]

NOTES:

Applicability—1984 c 209: See RCW 9.92.900.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.